Massachusetts, session 194th, S91.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 94G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 22 the 
following section:-  
Section 23. (a) Notwithstanding section 4(a)(x) and section 5 of this chapter, or any other 
general or special law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, from the effective date of this 
section until 180 days after the publication of the report to the Joint Committee on Cannabis 
Policy of the General Court pursuant to subsection (b), the commission shall not issue any 
marijuana retailer, marijuana cultivator or marijuana product manufacturer licenses to any person 
or entity unless such person or entity has submitted a marijuana establishment license application 
that has been deemed complete by the commission prior to the effective date of this section or 
unless such person is a participant in the social equity or economic empowerment program 
established by section 22 of this chapter. The moratorium established under this subsection shall 
not prohibit the issuance of any social consumption license.  

of 2 13  (b) The Cannabis Control Commission shall conduct or retain an outside expert in 
economic analysis to conduct and publish a study analyzing the businesses licensed under this 
chapter.  The study shall analyze the appropriate number of licenses to be licensed under this 
chapter, the adequacy of cannabis supply for patients and consumers, or whether an oversupply 
harms market participants, and the adequacy of the commission’s enforcement of its regulations 
with respect to cultivation tiers. The Commission shall publish the results of the study on its 
official website and submit a copy to the Joint Committee on Cannabis Policy. 
(c) The Commission shall commence the study required under subsection (b) no later 
than 30 days after the effective date of this section. 
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the moratorium established by this section shall not 
exceed one year from the effective date of this section. 
(e) This section shall be effective upon passage.